District of Columbia statutes.
3-3614

Repealed

Civil penalties.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133, § 2(f), 27 DCR 4417
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 407, 32 DCR 4450
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2614.